Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB974.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2004-I(a), (c) and (d) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.818, No.69), are amended, subsection (f) is amended by adding paragraphs and subsection (g) is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2004-I. Dual Credit Innovation Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Dual Credit Innovation Grant Program is established within the department to award grants to public institutions of higher education that offer dual credit opportunities to high school students enrolled in a school entity[.] and to community education councils that collaborate with one or more institutions of higher education to offer dual 123456789101112131415161718192021 credit opportunities to high school students enrolled in a school entity.* * *(c) Priority.--The department shall give priority in grant funding to public institutions of higher education that expand the current offerings of the public institution of higher education and to community education councils, in collaboration with one or more public institutions of higher education, with a particular emphasis on providing courses aligned with high-priority occupations and serving students experiencing education instability as defined in section 1331.1, students enrolled in career and technical education programs, low-income students, historically underserved student groups and students in rural areas of this Commonwealth.(d) Additional priority.--If the department does not receive sufficient applications to expend the available funding under this section, the department may award grants for the uses under subsection (b) to State-related institutions and independent institutions of higher education and community education councils in collaboration with one or more institutions of higher education.* * *(f) Reporting and accountability.--For the purpose of improving data collection and transparency related to the value of dual credit courses to the success of students as they graduate high school and transition to postsecondary education, the department shall annually collect student-level data from grant recipients and use other existing data resources to inform the following measures and post aggregate, de-identified information related to all of the following on the department's 20250SB0974PN1115 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website:* * *(10) The number of college credits earned by students enrolled in dual credit courses which were offered through a collaboration between a community education council and an institution of higher education.(11) The number of students enrolled in dual credit courses which were offered through a collaboration between a community education council and an institution of higher education.(12) The percentage of dual credit students who earned college credits through a collaboration between a community education council and an institution of higher education that enroll in an institution of higher education following high school graduation.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community education council." As defined in section 1901-D.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0974PN1115 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021